Illinois, session 104th, SB303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Senior Citizens and Persons with 5Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (320 ILCS 25/1)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 401)8    Sec. 1. Short title; common name. This Article shall be 9known and and may be cited as the Senior Citizens and Persons 10with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act. Common references 11to the "Circuit Breaker Act" mean this Article. As used in this 12Article, "this Act" means this Article.13(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)